North Carolina statutes. Chapter 136. Transportation.
Article 18A. North Carolina and South Carolina Rail Compact.

§§ 136-225,
136-226.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2018-142, s. 18, effective December 14, 2018.

History.

S. 136-225. 2014-121, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2018-142, s. 18, effective December 14, 2018; s. 136-225. 2014-121, s. 1; repealed by Session Laws 2018-142, s. 18, effective December 14, 2018.

§§ 136-227 through 136-249.

Reserved for future codification purposes.